Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8055.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-5-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-5 entitled "Assaults" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
11-5-1. Assault with intent to commit specified felonies.
(a) Every person who shall make an assault with intent to commit murder, robbery, sexual
assault, burglary, or the abominable and detestable crime against nature, shall be imprisoned not
exceeding twenty (20) years nor less than one year.
(b) Every person who shall make an assault with the intent to commit murder shall be
imprisoned for not exceeding forty (40) years nor less than ten (10) years and the person shall not
be afforded the benefit of suspension or deferment of their sentence, nor of probation for any
sentence imposed by the court.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004891
========